Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1670XS (2) 91 ss/ns S.F. 164 Section 1. Section 48A.18, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. a. Each Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , each 3 state motor vehicle driverâs license application, including 4 any renewal application or application for a nonoperatorâs 5 identification card, submitted to the office of driver services 6 of the state department of transportation shall serve as 7 an application for voter registration unless the applicant 8 declines to register to vote. A completed voter registration 9 form submitted to the office of driver services of the state 10 department of transportation shall be considered to update any 11 previous voter registration by the registrant. 12 b. An application for a state motor vehicle driverâs license 13 or nonoperatorâs identification card shall not serve as an 14 application for voter registration if the applicant submits 15 documentation demonstrating that the applicant is not a citizen 16 of the United States. 17 Sec. 2. Section 48A.19, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 18 to read as follows: 19 3. The Except as provided in subsection 7, the voter 20 registration agency shall provide voter registration services 21 with each application for services or assistance and with each 22 recertification, renewal, or change of address form completed 23 relating to the agencyâs services. The secretary of state 24 shall adopt administrative rules in cooperation with voter 25 registration agencies to carry out the requirements of this 26 section . 27 Sec. 3. Section 48A.19, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 28 following new subsection: 29 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. The voter registration agency shall not 30 provide voter registration services to a person submitting an 31 application for services or assistance or a recertification, 32 renewal, or change of address form completed relating to 33 the agencyâs services if the person submits documentation 34 demonstrating that the person is not a citizen of the United 35 -1- LSB 1670XS (2) 91 ss/ns 1/ 2 S.F. 164 States. 1